South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S934.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-17-520 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-17-520. (A) Any person who shall (a)It is unlawful for a person to wilfully and maliciously: (1) disturb or interrupt any meeting, society, assembly or congregation convened for the purpose of religious worship, (b) at a tax-exempt place of worship, regardless of whether the conduct is within the place at which the assemblage is held or is on the property on which that place is located and which disturbs the order and solemnity of the assemblage; (2) enter such meeting while in a state of intoxication or (c) use or sell spirituous liquors, or; (3) use blasphemous, profane, or obscene language at or near the place of meeting; or (4) disturb or interfere with a virtual meeting or gathering, by interactive video conference or teleconference, of people for religious worship through the use of a computer, computer system, telecommunications device, or other electronic device or system, or in any other manner. (B) shall beA person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanorfelony and shall, onupon conviction, must be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than twenty nor more than one hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for a term of not exceeding one year or less than thirty days, either or both, at the discretion of the courtmore than five years. SECTION 2.  The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide.  After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----